Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-516
Buildings; condemnation or repair orders; service upon owner and tenant.

A copy of the order filed in accordance with section 81-515 together with a written notice that the same has been so filed and will be put in force unless the owner or occupying tenant shall file with the clerk of said court his or her objections and answer thereto within the time specified in section 81-517, shall be served upon the owner of the building or structure so directed to be altered, repaired, or demolished, and if there be a tenant occupying the building, then also upon the occupant, which service shall be made upon such owner and tenant, if there be one, in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 15, p. 485;

C.S.1929, § 81-5515;

R.S.1943, § 81-516;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 94.